Utah statutes.
34A-2-104.   "Employee," "worker," and "operative" defined -- Specific
circumstances -- Exemptions.
(1)  As used in this chapter and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act,
"employee," "worker," and "operative" mean:
(a) (i)  an elective or appointive officer and any other person:
(A)  in the service of:
(I)  the state;
(II)  a county, city, or town within the state; or
(III)  a school district within the state;
(B)  serving the state, or any county, city, town, or school district under:
(I)  an election;
(II)  appointment; or
(III)  any contract of hire, express or implied, written or oral; and
(ii)  including:
(A)  an officer or employee of the state institutions of learning; and
(B)  a member of the National Guard while on state active duty; and
(b)  a person in the service of any employer, as defined in Section 34A-2-103,
who employs one or more workers or operatives regularly in the same business,
or in or about the same establishment:
(i)  under any contract of hire:
(A)  express or implied; and
(B)  oral or written;
(ii)  including aliens and minors, whether legally or illegally working for
hire; and
(iii)  not including any person whose employment:
(A)  is casual; and
(B)  not in the usual course of the trade, business, or occupation of the
employee's employer.
(2) (a)  Unless a lessee provides coverage as an employer under this chapter
and Chapter 3, any lessee in mines or of mining property and each employee and
sublessee of the lessee shall be:
(i)  covered for compensation by the lessor under this chapter and Chapter 3;
(ii)  subject to this chapter and Chapter 3; and
(iii)  entitled to the benefits of this chapter and Chapter 3, to the same
extent as if the lessee, employee, or sublessee were employees of the lessor
drawing the wages paid employees for substantially similar work.
(b)  The lessor may deduct from the proceeds of ores mined by the lessees an
amount equal to the insurance premium for that type of work.
(3) (a)  A partnership or sole proprietorship may elect to include any partner
of the partnership or owner of the sole proprietorship as an employee of the
partnership or sole proprietorship under this chapter and Chapter 3.
(b)  If a partnership or sole proprietorship makes an election under
Subsection (3)(a), the partnership or sole proprietorship shall serve written
notice upon its insurance carrier naming the persons to be covered.
(c)  A partner of a partnership or owner of a sole proprietorship may not be
considered an employee of the partner's partnership or the owner's sole
proprietorship under this chapter or Chapter 3 until the notice described in
Subsection (3)(b) is given.
(d)  For premium rate making, the insurance carrier shall assume the salary or
wage of the partner or sole proprietor electing coverage under Subsection
(3)(a) to be 100% of the state's average weekly wage.
(4) (a)  A corporation may elect not to include any director or officer of the
corporation as an employee under this chapter and Chapter 3.
(b)  If a corporation makes an election under Subsection (4)(a), the
corporation shall serve written notice upon its insurance carrier naming the
persons to be excluded from coverage.
(c)  A director or officer of a corporation is considered an employee under
this chapter and Chapter 3 until the notice described in Subsection (4)(b) is
given.
(5)  As used in this chapter and Chapter 3, "employee," "worker," and
"operative" do not include:
(a)  a real estate sales agent or real estate broker, as defined in Section
61-2-2, who performs services in that capacity for a real estate broker if:
(i)  substantially all of the real estate sales agent's or associated broker's
income for services is from real estate commissions; and
(ii)  the services of the real estate sales agent or associated broker are
performed under a written contract that:
(A)  the real estate agent is an independent contractor; and
(B)  the real estate sales agent or associated broker is not to be treated as
an employee for federal income tax purposes;
(b)  an offender performing labor under Section 64-13-16 or 64-13-19, except
as required by federal statute or regulation;
(c)  an individual who for an insurance producer, as defined in Section
31A-1-301, solicits, negotiates, places or procures insurance if:
(i)  substantially all of the individual's income from those services is from
insurance commissions; and
(ii)  the services of the individual are performed under a written contract
that states that the individual:
(A)  is an independent contractor;
(B)  is not to be treated as an employee for federal income tax purposes; and
(C)  can derive income from more than one insurance company;
(d)  notwithstanding Subsection 34A-2-103(4), an individual who provides
domestic work for a person if:
(i)  the person for whom the domestic work is being provided receives or is
eligible to receive the domestic work under a state or federal program
designed to pay the costs of domestic work to prevent the person from being
placed in:
(A)  an institution; or
(B)  a more restrictive placement than where that person resides at the time
the person receives the domestic work;
(ii)  the individual is paid by a person designated by the Secretary of the
Treasury in accordance with Section 3504, Internal Revenue Code, as a
fiduciary, agent, or other person that has the control, receipt, custody, or
disposal of, or pays the wages of the individual; and
(iii)  the domestic work is performed under a written contract that notifies
the individual that the individual is not an employee under this chapter or
Chapter 3; or
(e)  subject to Subsections (6) and (7), an individual who:
(i) (A)  owns a motor vehicle; or
(B)  leases a motor vehicle to a motor carrier;
(ii)  personally operates the motor vehicle described in Subsection (5)(e)(i);
(iii)  operates the motor vehicle described in Subsection (5)(e)(i) under a
written agreement with the motor carrier that states that the individual
operates the motor vehicle as an independent contractor; and
(iv)  provides to the motor carrier at the time the written agreement
described in Subsection (5)(e)(iii) is executed or as soon after the execution
as provided by an insurer:
(A)  a copy of a workers' compensation coverage waiver issued pursuant to
Section 31A-22-1011 by an insurer to the individual; and
(B)  proof that the individual is covered by occupational accident related
insurance.
(6)  An individual described in Subsection (5)(d) or (e) may become an
employee under this chapter and Chapter 3 if the employer of the individual
complies with:
(a)  this chapter and Chapter 3; and
(b)  commission rules.
(7)  For purposes of Subsection (5)(e):
(a)  "Motor carrier" means a person engaged in the business of transporting
freight, merchandise, or other property by a commercial vehicle on a highway
within this state.
(b)  "Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle intended primarily for use
and operation on the highways, including a trailer or semitrailer designed for
use with another motorized vehicle.
(c)  "Occupational accident related insurance" means insurance that provides
the following coverage for an injury sustained in the course of working under
a written agreement described in Subsection (5)(e)(iii):
(i)  disability benefits;
(ii)  death benefits;
(iii)  medical expense benefits, which include:
(A)  hospital coverage;
(B)  surgical coverage;
(C)  prescription drug coverage; and
(D)  dental coverage.
